North Dakota, session 69, HB1275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS
FUND - INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION - NATURAL GAS DISTRIBUTION INFRASTRUCTURE
GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic
investment and improvements fund, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $5,000,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the industrial commission, for a natural gas
distribution infrastructure grant program, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027. The industrial commission shall develop guidelines for a natural gas distribution
infrastructure grant program, including the eligibility criteria and maximum grant amounts. The
grant funding is available to political subdivisions, public service commission regulated gas
distribution entities, and individuals located in cities with a population of no more than ten
thousand. The grant funding may be used only for costs to install natural gas distribution
infrastructure. The funding provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item. A
grant applicant shall provide a minimum of fifty percent matching funds, with priority given to a
project having a greater level of matching funds.
Page No. 1 25.1056.02000